Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Subarticle A. Merger and Share Exchange

§ 17-16-1101.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-16-1102.
Merger.

One (1) or more domestic business corporations may merge with one (1) or more domestic or foreign business corporations or eligible entities pursuant to a plan of merger, or two (2) or more foreign business corporations or domestic or foreign eligible entities may merge into a new domestic business corporation to be created in the merger in the manner provided in this chapter.

A foreign business corporation, or a foreign eligible entity, may be a party to a merger with a domestic business corporation, or may be created by the terms of the plan of merger, only if the merger is permitted by the foreign business corporation or eligible entity. If Wyoming law does not otherwise provide procedures for the approval of a merger, a plan of merger may be adopted and approved, the merger effectuated, and appraisal rights exercised in accordance with the procedures in this article and article 13 of this chapter. For the purposes of applying this article and article 13 of this chapter:

The eligible entity, its members or interest holders, eligible interests and organic documents taken together shall be deemed to be a domestic business corporation, shareholders, shares and articles of incorporation, respectively and vice versa as the context may require; and

If the business and affairs of the eligible entity are managed by a group of persons that is not identical to the members or interest holders, that group shall be deemed to be the board of directors.

The plan of merger shall include:

The name of each domestic or foreign business corporation or eligible entity that will merge and the name of the domestic or foreign business corporation or eligible entity that will be the survivor of the merger;

The terms and conditions of the merger;

The manner and basis of the disposition, if any, of the shares of each domestic or foreign business corporation and eligible interests of each domestic or foreign eligible entity;

The articles of incorporation of any domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation, or the organic documents of any domestic or foreign unincorporated entity, to be created by the merger, or if a new domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation or unincorporated entity is not to be created by the merger, any amendments to the survivor’s articles of incorporation or organic documents; and

Any other provisions required by the laws under which any party to the merger is organized or by which it is governed, or by the articles of incorporation or organic document of any party to the merger.

The terms of the plan of merger may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan.

The plan of merger may also include a provision that the plan may be amended prior to filing articles of merger, but if the shareholders of a domestic corporation that is a party to the merger are required or permitted to vote on the plan, the plan must provide that subsequent to approval of the plan by the shareholders the plan may not be amended to change:

The disposition of shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or eligible interests, cash, or other property, if any, to be received under the plan by the shareholders of or owners of eligible interests in any party to the merger;

The articles of incorporation of any corporation, or the organic documents of any unincorporated entity, that will survive or be created as a result of the merger, except for changes permitted by W.S.

17-16-1005

or by comparable provisions of the organic laws of any such foreign corporation or domestic or foreign unincorporated entity; or

Any of the other terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect such shareholders in any material respect.

Property held in trust or for charitable purposes under the laws of this state by a domestic or foreign eligible entity shall not be diverted by a merger from the objects for which it was donated, granted or devised, unless and until the eligible entity obtains an order of the district court specifying the disposition of the property to the extent required by and pursuant to the laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

Cross references. —

As to prohibition against consolidation or combination of corporations to prevent competition, see art. 10, § 8, Wyo. Const.

As to merger of state banks, see §§

13-4-104

through

13-4-114

.

As to employing unit acquiring business assuming accounts and contribution rates of acquired unit, with reference to unemployment compensation, see §

27-3-507

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote this section, which read: “(a) One (1) or more corporations may merge into another corporation if the board of directors of each corporation adopts and, if required by W.S.

17-16-1103

, its shareholders approve a plan of merger.

“(b) The plan of merger shall set forth:

“(i) The name of each corporation planning to merge and the name of the surviving corporation into which each other corporation plans to merge;

“(ii) The terms and conditions of the merger; and

“(iii) The manner and basis of converting the shares of each corporation into shares, obligations or other securities of the surviving or any other corporation or into cash or other property in whole or part.

“(c) The plan of merger may set forth:

“(i) Amendments to the articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation; and

“(ii) Other provisions relating to the merger.”

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Valuation of stock of dissenting stockholders in case of consolidation or merger of corporation, 48 ALR3d 430.

Similarity of ownership or control as basis for charging corporation acquiring assets of another with liability for the former owner's debts, 49 ALR3d 881.

Validity and construction of state statute making successor corporation liable for taxes of predecessor, 65 ALR3d 1181.

Liability of successor corporation for injury or damage caused by product of predecessor, 66 ALR3d 824.

Sufficiency, under § 14 of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78n) and implementing regulations, of proxy or information statement incident to merger of corporation, 4 ALR Fed 1021.

§ 17-16-1103.
Share exchange.

Through a share exchange:

A domestic corporation may acquire all of the shares of one (1) or more classes or series of shares of another domestic or foreign corporation, or all of the interests of one (1) or more classes or series of interests of a domestic or foreign other entity, in exchange for shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares or other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, pursuant to a plan of share exchange; or

All of the shares of one (1) or more classes or series of shares of a domestic corporation may be acquired by another domestic or foreign corporation or other entity, in exchange for shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares or other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, pursuant to a plan of share exchange.

A foreign corporation or eligible entity, may be a party to a share exchange only if the share exchange is permitted by the organic law under which the corporation or other entity is organized or by which it is governed. If Wyoming law does not otherwise provide procedures for the approval of a share exchange, a plan of share exchange may be adopted and approved, and the share exchange effectuated, in accordance with the procedures, if any, for a merger. If Wyoming law does not otherwise provide procedures for the approval of either a share exchange or a merger, a plan of share exchange may be adopted and approved, the share exchange effectuated, and appraisal rights exercised, in accordance with the procedures in this article and article 13 of this chapter. For the purposes of applying this article and article 13 of this chapter:

The other entity, its interest holders, interests and organic documents taken together shall be deemed to be a domestic business corporation, shareholders, shares and articles of incorporation, respectively and vice versa as the context may require; and

If the business and affairs of the other entity are managed by a group of persons that is not identical to the interest holders, that group shall be deemed to be the board of directors.

The plan of exchange shall include:

The name of each corporation or other entity whose shares or interests will be acquired and the name of the corporation or other entity that will acquire those shares or interests;

The terms and conditions of the share exchange;

The manner and basis of exchanging the shares of a corporation or interests in any other entity whose shares or interests will be acquired under the share exchange into shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or interests, cash, other property or any combination of the foregoing; and

Any other provisions required by the laws under which any party to the share exchange is organized or by the articles of incorporation or organic document of any party to the share exchange.

Terms of a plan of share exchange may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan.

The plan of share exchange may also include a provision that the plan may be amended prior to filing articles of share exchange, but if the shareholders of a domestic corporation that is a party to the share exchange are required or permitted to vote on the plan, the plan shall provide that subsequent to approval of the plan by the shareholders the plan may not be amended to change:

The amount or kind of shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or interests, cash, or other property to be issued by the corporation or to be received under the plan by the shareholders of or owners of interests in any party to the share exchange; or

Any of the other terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect the shareholders of the domestic corporation in any material respect.

This section does not limit the power of a domestic corporation to acquire shares of another corporation or interests in another entity in a transaction other than a share exchange.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the section, which read: “(a) A corporation may acquire all of the outstanding shares of one (1) or more classes or series of another corporation if the board of directors of each corporation adopts and, if required by W.S.

17-16-1103

, its shareholders approve the exchange.

“(b) The plan of exchange shall set forth:

“(i) The name of the corporation whose shares will be acquired and the name of the acquiring corporation;

“(ii) The terms and conditions of the exchange; and

“(iii) The manner and basis of exchanging the shares to be acquired for shares, obligations or other securities of the acquiring or any other corporation or for cash or other property in whole or part.

“(c) The plan of exchange may set forth other provisions relating to the exchange.

“(d) This section does not limit the power of a corporation to acquire all or part of the shares of one (1) or more classes or series of another corporation through a voluntary exchange or otherwise.”

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-1104.
Action on plan of merger or share exchange.

In the case of a domestic corporation that is a party to a merger or share exchange, the plan of merger or share exchange shall be adopted by the board of directors. After adopting a plan of merger or share exchange, the board of directors except as provided in subsection (g) of this section and W.S.

17-16-1105

, shall submit the plan to the shareholders for their approval. The board of directors shall also transmit to the shareholders a recommendation that the shareholders approve the plan, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors shall transmit to the shareholders the basis for that determination.

Reserved.

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposed merger or share exchange to the shareholders on any basis.

If the plan of merger or share exchange is required to be approved by the shareholders and if the approval is to be given at a meeting, the corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the shareholders’ meeting at which the plan is to be submitted for approval. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. If the corporation is to be merged into an existing corporation or other entity, the notice shall also include or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the articles of incorporation or organizational documents of that corporation or other entity. If the corporation is to be merged into a corporation or other entity that is to be created pursuant to the merger, the notice shall include or be accompanied by a copy or a summary of the articles of incorporation or organizational documents of the new corporation or other entity.

Unless the articles of incorporation or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (c) of this section require a greater vote or a greater number of votes to be present, approval of the plan of merger or share exchange requires the approval of the shareholders at a meeting at which a quorum exists, and, if any class or series of shares is entitled to vote as a separate group on the plan of merger or share exchange, the approval of each such separate voting group at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group is present.

Separate voting by voting groups is required:

On a plan of merger by each class or series of shares that:

Are to be converted under the plan of merger into other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or interests, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing; or

Would be entitled to vote as a separate group on a provision in the plan that, if contained in a proposed amendment to articles of incorporation, would require action by separate voting groups under W.S.

17-16-1004

;

On a plan of share exchange by each class or series of shares included in the exchange, with each class or series constituting a separate voting group; and

On a plan of merger or share exchange, if the voting group is entitled under the articles of incorporation to vote as a voting group to approve a plan of merger or share exchange.

Unless the articles of incorporation otherwise provide, approval by the corporation’s shareholders of a plan of merger or share exchange is not required if:

The corporation will survive the merger or is the acquiring corporation in a share exchange;

Except for amendments permitted by W.S.

17-16-1005

, its articles of incorporation will not be changed;

Each shareholder of the corporation whose shares were outstanding immediately before the effective date of the merger or share exchange will hold the same number of shares, with identical preferences, limitations, and relative rights, immediately after the effective date of change; and

The issuance in the merger or share exchange of shares or other securities convertible into or rights exercisable for shares does not require a vote under W.S. 17-16-621(f).

If as a result of a merger or share exchange one (1) or more shareholders of a domestic corporation would become subject to owner liability for the debts, obligations or liabilities of any other person or entity, approval of the plan of merger or share exchange shall require the execution, by each shareholder of the domestic corporation, of a separate written consent to become subject to owner liability.

After a merger or share exchange is authorized, and at any time before articles of merger or share exchange are filed, the planned merger or share exchange may be abandoned, subject to any contractual rights, without further shareholder action, in accordance with the procedure set forth in the plan of merger or share exchange or, if none is set forth, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2004 amendment,

in (j), deleted “of” after “or share.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a), which read: “After adopting a plan of merger or share exchange, the board of directors of each corporation party to the merger, and the board of directors of the corporation whose shares will be acquired in the share exchange, shall submit the plan of merger, except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, or share exchange for approval by its shareholders.”; repealed former (b), which covered the procedures for a plan of merger or share exchange to be approved; added “to the shareholders” in (c); rewrote former (d) through (f), which read: “(d) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance with W.S.

17-16-705

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan of merger or share exchange and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan.

“(e) Unless this act, the articles of incorporation or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (c) of this section require a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the plan of merger or share exchange to be authorized shall be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan by that voting group.

“(f) Separate voting by voting groups is required:

“(i) On a plan of merger if the plan contains a provision that, if contained in a proposed amendment to articles of incorporation, would require action by one (1) or more separate voting groups on the proposed amendment under W.S.

17-16-1004

; or

“(ii) On a plan of share exchange by each class or series of shares included in the exchange, with each class or series constituting a separate voting group.”; rewrote the introductory language of (g) which read: “Action by the shareholders of the surviving corporation on a plan of merger is not required if:”; repealed former (g)(i) through (iv), which read: “(i) The articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation will not differ, except for amendments enumerated in W.S.

17-16-1002

, from its articles before the merger;

“(ii) Each shareholder of the surviving corporation whose shares were outstanding immediately before the effective date of the merger will hold the same number of shares, with identical designations, preferences, limitations and relative rights, immediately after;

“(iii) The number of voting shares outstanding immediately after the merger, plus the number of voting shares issuable as a result of the merger, either by the conversion of securities issued pursuant to the merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued pursuant to the merger, will not exceed by more than twenty percent (20%) the total number of voting shares of the surviving corporation outstanding immediately before the merger; and

“(iv) The number of participating shares outstanding immediately after the merger, plus the number of participating shares issuable as a result of the merger, either by the conversion of securities issued pursuant to the merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued pursuant to the merger, will not exceed by more than twenty percent (20%) the total number of participating shares outstanding immediately before the merger”; added (g)(v) through (viii); repealed former (h), which defined “participating shares” and “voting shares”; and added (k).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 17-16-1105.
Merger between parent and subsidiary or between subsidiaries.

A domestic parent corporation that owns shares of a domestic or foreign subsidiary corporation that carry at least eighty percent (80%) of the voting power of each class and series of the outstanding shares of a subsidiary that have voting power may merge the subsidiary into itself or into another such subsidiary, or merge itself into the subsidiary, without approval of the board of directors or shareholders of the subsidiary, unless the articles of incorporation of any of the corporations otherwise provide, and unless, in the case of a foreign subsidiary, approval by the subsidiary’s board of directors or shareholders is required by the laws under which the subsidiary is organized.

If under subsection (a) of this section approval of a merger by the subsidiary’s shareholders is not required, the parent corporation shall, within ten (10) days after the effective date of the merger, notify each of the subsidiary’s shareholders that the merger has become effective.

Except as provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, a merger between a parent and a subsidiary shall be governed by the provisions of this article applicable to mergers generally.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a), which read: “A parent corporation owning at least eighty percent (80%) of the outstanding shares of each class of a subsidiary corporation may merge the subsidiary into itself without approval of the shareholders of the parent or subsidiary.”; repealed former (b) through (e), which read: “(b) The board of directors of the parent shall adopt a plan of merger that sets forth:

“(i) The names of the parent and subsidiary; and

“(ii) The manner and basis of converting the shares of the subsidiary into shares, obligations or other securities of the parent or any other corporation or into cash or other property in whole or part.

“(c) The parent shall mail a copy or summary of the plan of merger to each shareholder of the subsidiary who does not waive the mailing requirement in writing.

“(d) The parent may not deliver articles of merger to the secretary of state for filing until at least thirty (30) days after the date it mailed a copy of the plan of merger to each shareholder of the subsidiary who did not waive the mailing requirement.

“(e) Articles of merger under this section may not contain amendments to the articles of incorporation of the parent corporation, except for amendments enumerated in W.S.

17-16-1002

.”; and added present (b) and (c).

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-1106.
Articles of merger or share exchange.

After a plan of merger or share exchange has been adopted and approved as required by this act, articles of merger or share exchange shall be executed on behalf of the surviving or acquiring corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles shall set forth:

The names of the parties to the merger or share exchange;

If the articles of incorporation of the survivor of a merger are amended, or if a new corporation is created as a result of a merger, the amendments to the survivor’s articles of incorporation or the articles of incorporation of the new corporation;

If the plan of merger or share exchange required approval by the shareholders of a domestic corporation that was a party to the merger or share exchange, a statement that the plan was duly approved by the shareholders and, if voting by any separate voting group was required, by each such separate voting group, in the manner required by this act and the articles of incorporation;

If the plan of merger or share exchange did not require approval by the shareholders of a domestic corporation that was a party to the merger or share exchange, a statement to that effect; and

As to each foreign corporation or eligible entity that was a party to the merger or share exchange, a statement that the participation of the foreign corporation or eligible entity was duly authorized as required by the organic law of the corporation or eligible entity.

Articles of merger or share exchange shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing by the survivor of the merger or the acquiring corporation in a share exchange, and shall take effect upon the effective time provided in W.S.

17-16-123

. Articles of merger or share exchange filed under this section may be combined with any filing required under any other provision of Wyoming law if the combined filing satisfies the requirements of both this section and any other provision of Wyoming law.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the section, which read: “(a) After a plan of merger or share exchange is approved by the shareholders, or adopted by the board of directors if shareholder approval is not required, the surviving or acquiring corporation shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of merger or share exchange setting forth:

“(i) The plan of merger or share exchange;

“(ii) If shareholder approval was not required, a statement to that effect; and

“(iii) If approval of the shareholders of one (1) or more corporations party to the merger or share exchange was required;

“(A) The designation, number of outstanding shares, and number of votes entitled to be cast by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan as to each corporation; and

“(B) Either the total number of votes cast for and against the plan by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the plan separately by each voting group and a statement that the number cast for the plan by each voting group was sufficient for approval by that voting group.

“(b) A merger or share exchange takes effect upon the effective date of the articles of merger or share exchange.”

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-1107.
Effect of merger or share exchange.

When a merger becomes effective:

The corporation or eligible entity that is designated in the plan of merger as the survivor continues or comes into existence, as the case may be and the separate existence of every corporation or eligible entity that is merged into the survivor ceases;

Reserved;

All property owned by, and every contract right possessed by, each corporation or eligible entity that merges into the survivor is vested in the survivor without reversion or impairment;

All liabilities of each corporation or eligible entity that is merged into the survivor are vested in the survivor;

The name of the survivor may, but need not be, substituted in any pending proceeding for the name of any party to the merger whose separate existence ceased in the merger;

The articles of incorporation or organic documents of the survivor are amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger;

The shares of each corporation that is a party to the merger, and the interests in an eligible entity that is a party to a merger, that are to be converted under the plan of merger into shares, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire securities, other securities, or eligible interests, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, are converted, and the former holders of the shares or eligible interests are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of merger or to any rights they may have under article 13 of this chapter or the organic law of the eligible entity; and

The articles of incorporation or organic documents of a survivor that is created by the merger become effective.

When a share exchange becomes effective, the shares of each domestic corporation that are to be exchanged for shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares or other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, are entitled only to the rights provided to them in the plan of share exchange or to any rights they may have under article 13 of this chapter.

A person who becomes subject to owner liability for some or all of the debts, obligations or liabilities of any entity as a result of a merger or share exchange shall have owner liability only to the extent provided in the organic law of the entity and only for those debts, obligations and liabilities that arise after the effective time of the articles of merger or share exchange.

Upon a merger becoming effective, a foreign corporation, or a foreign eligible entity, that is the survivor of the merger is deemed to:

Appoint the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in a proceeding to enforce the rights of shareholders of each domestic corporation that is a party to the merger who exercise appraisal rights; and

Agree that it will promptly pay the amount, if any, to which such shareholders are entitled under article 13.

The effect of a merger or share exchange on the owner liability of a person who had owner liability for some or all of the debts, obligations or liabilities of a party to the merger or share exchange shall be as follows:

The merger or share exchange does not discharge any owner liability under the organic law of the entity in which the person was a shareholder or interest holder to the extent any owner liability arose before the effective time of the articles of merger or share exchange;

The person shall not have owner liability under the organic law of the entity in which the person was a shareholder or interest holder prior to the merger or share exchange for any debt, obligation or liability that arises after the effective time of the articles of merger or share exchange;

The provisions of the organic law of any entity for which the person had owner liability before the merger or share exchange shall continue to apply to the collection or discharge of any owner liability preserved by paragraph (i) of this subsection, as if the merger or share exchange had not occurred;

The person shall have whatever rights of contribution from other persons are provided by the organic law of the entity for which the person had owner liability with respect to any owner liability preserved by paragraph (i) of this subsection, as if the merger or share exchange had not occurred.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the section, which read: “(a) When a merger takes effect:

“(i) Every other corporation party to the merger merges into the surviving corporation and the separate existence of every corporation except the surviving corporation ceases;

“(ii) The title to all real estate and other property owned by each corporation party to the merger is vested in the surviving corporation without reversion or impairment;

“(iii) The surviving corporation has all liabilities of each corporation party to the merger;

“(iv) A proceeding pending against any corporation party to the merger may be continued as if the merger did not occur or the surviving corporation may be substituted in the proceeding for the corporation whose existence ceased;

“(v) The articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation are amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger; and

“(vi) The shares of each corporation party to the merger that are to be converted into shares, obligations or other securities of the surviving or any other corporation or into cash or other property are converted, and the former holders of the shares are entitled only to the rights provided in the articles of merger or to their rights under article 13.

“(b) When a share exchange takes effect, the shares of each acquired corporation are exchanged as provided in the plan, and the former holders of the shares are entitled only to the exchange rights provided in the articles of share exchange or to their rights under article 13.”

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Merger or consolidation of corporate lessee as breach of clause in lease prohibiting, conditioning or restricting assignment or sublease, 39 ALR4th 879.

Liability of successor corporation for punitive damages for injury caused by predecessor's product, 55 ALR4th 166.

§ 17-16-1108.
Abandonment of a merger or share exchange.

Unless otherwise provided in a plan of merger or share exchange or in the laws under which a foreign business corporation or a domestic or foreign eligible entity that is a party to a merger or a share exchange is organized or by which it is governed, after the plan has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, and at any time before the merger or share exchange has become effective, it may be abandoned by a domestic business corporation that is a party thereto without action by its shareholders in accordance with any procedures set forth in the plan of merger or share exchange or, if no such procedures are set forth in the plan, in the manner determined by the board of directors, subject to any contractual rights of other parties to the merger or share exchange.

If a merger or share exchange is abandoned under subsection (a) of this section after articles of merger or share exchange have been filed with the secretary of state but before the merger or share exchange has become effective, a statement that the merger or share exchange has been abandoned in accordance with this section, executed on behalf of a party to the merger or share exchange by an officer or other duly authorized representative, shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing prior to the effective date of the merger or share exchange. Upon filing, the statement shall take effect and the merger or share exchange shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.